Utah statutes.
58-80a-303.   Qualifications for certification.
A person qualifies as a certified medical language interpreter if the person:
(1)  acts as a medical language interpreter between English and at least one
of the following languages:
(a)  Spanish;
(b)  Russian;
(c)  Bosnian;
(d)  Somali;
(e)  Mandarin Chinese;
(f)  Cantonese; or
(g)  Navajo;
(2)  passes an examination administered by, or under contract with, the
division, that tests:
(a)  the following areas, with respect to the language for which the person
applies for certification:
(i)  basic language fluency;
(ii)  basic medical terminology, including the ability to:
(A)  name human body parts;
(B)  name internal human organs;
(C)  describe basic medical symptoms; and
(D)  describe basic medical instructions, including dosage amounts and
frequency; and
(iii)  basic cultural competency relating to medical care beliefs and
practices that are common to people who speak that language;
(b)  knowledge and understanding of the national standards of practice; and
(c)  a basic understanding of medical confidentiality requirements, including
the confidentiality requirements of the federal Health Insurance Portability
and Accountability Act;
(3)  signs a statement agreeing to abide by the national standards of
practice; and
(4)  pays the fee described in Section 58-80a-305.
